ckb/dictionaries/ckb.aff
PFX V Y 875
PFX V 0 دە .
PFX V 0 ئە .
PFX V 0 نا .
PFX V 0 مە .
PFX V 0 نە .
PFX V 0 ب .
PFX V 0 م .
PFX V 0 ت .
PFX V 0 ی .
PFX V 0 مان .
PFX V 0 تان .
PFX V 0 یان .
PFX V 0 دەم .
PFX V 0 دەت .
PFX V 0 دەی .
PFX V 0 دەتان .
PFX V 0 دەمان .
PFX V 0 دەیان .
PFX V 0 ئەم .
PFX V 0 ئەت .
PFX V 0 ئەی .
PFX V 0 ئەمان .
PFX V 0 ئەتان .
PFX V 0 ئەیان .
PFX V 0 نام .
PFX V 0 نات .
PFX V 0 نای .
PFX V 0 نامان .
PFX V 0 ناتان .
PFX V 0 نایان .
PFX V 0 مەم .
PFX V 0 مەت .
PFX V 0 مەی .
PFX V 0 مەمان .
PFX V 0 مەتان .
PFX V 0 مەیان .
PFX V 0 نەم .
PFX V 0 نەت .
PFX V 0 نەی .
PFX V 0 نەمان .
PFX V 0 نەتان .
PFX V 0 نەیان .
PFX V 0 بم .
PFX V 0 بت .
PFX V 0 بی .
PFX V 0 بمان .
PFX V 0 بتان .
PFX V 0 بیان .
PFX V 0 پێ  .
PFX V 0 پێک .
PFX V 0 تێ .
PFX V 0 تێک .
PFX V 0 دا .
PFX V 0 دەر .
PFX V 0 ڕا .
PFX V 0 سەر .
PFX V 0 بەر .
PFX V 0 لێ .
PFX V 0 هەڵ .
PFX V 0 وێ .
PFX V 0 وەر .
PFX V 0 ڕۆ .
PFX V 0 بەر .
PFX V 0 وێک .
PFX V 0 لێک .
PFX V 0 پێدە  .
PFX V 0 پێئە  .
PFX V 0 پێنا  .
PFX V 0 پێمە  .
PFX V 0 پێنە  .
PFX V 0 پێب  .
PFX V 0 پێکدە .
PFX V 0 پێکئە .
PFX V 0 پێکنا .
PFX V 0 پێکنە .
PFX V 0 پێکمە .
PFX V 0 پێکب .
PFX V 0 تێدە .
PFX V 0 تێئە .
PFX V 0 تێنا .
PFX V 0 تێمە .
PFX V 0 تێنە .
PFX V 0 تێب .
PFX V 0 تێکدە .
PFX V 0 تێکئە .
PFX V 0 تێکنا .
PFX V 0 تێکنە .
PFX V 0 تێکمە .
PFX V 0 تێکب .
PFX V 0 دادە .
PFX V 0 دائە .
PFX V 0 دانا .
PFX V 0 دامە .
PFX V 0 دانە .
PFX V 0 داب .
PFX V 0 دەردە .
PFX V 0 دەرئە .
PFX V 0 دەرنا .
PFX V 0 دەرمە .
PFX V 0 دەرنە .
PFX V 0 دەرب .
PFX V 0 ڕادە .
PFX V 0 ڕائە .
PFX V 0 ڕانا .
PFX V 0 ڕانە .
PFX V 0 ڕامە .
PFX V 0 ڕاب .
PFX V 0 سەردە .
PFX V 0 سەرئە .
PFX V 0 سەرنا .
PFX V 0 سەرمە .
PFX V 0 سەرنە .
PFX V 0 سەرب .
PFX V 0 بەردە .
PFX V 0 بەرئە .
PFX V 0 بەرنا .
PFX V 0 بەرنە .
PFX V 0 بەرمە .
PFX V 0 بەرب .
PFX V 0 لێدە .
PFX V 0 لێئە .
PFX V 0 لێنا .
PFX V 0 لێمە .
PFX V 0 لێنە .
PFX V 0 لێب .
PFX V 0 هەڵدە .
PFX V 0 هەڵئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵنا .
PFX V 0 هەڵمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵنە .
PFX V 0 هەڵب .
PFX V 0 وێدە .
PFX V 0 وێئە .
PFX V 0 وێنا .
PFX V 0 وێنە .
PFX V 0 وێمە .
PFX V 0 وێب .
PFX V 0 وەردە .
PFX V 0 وەرئە .
PFX V 0 وەرنا .
PFX V 0 وەرنە .
PFX V 0 وەرمە .
PFX V 0 وەرب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆدە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆنا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆنە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆب .
PFX V 0 بەردە .
PFX V 0 بەرئە .
PFX V 0 بەرنا .
PFX V 0 بەرنە .
PFX V 0 بەرمە .
PFX V 0 بەرب .
PFX V 0 وێکدە .
PFX V 0 وێکئە .
PFX V 0 وێکنا .
PFX V 0 وێکمە .
PFX V 0 وێکنە .
PFX V 0 وێکب .
PFX V 0 لێکدە .
PFX V 0 لێکئە .
PFX V 0 لێکنا .
PFX V 0 لێکنە .
PFX V 0 لێکمە .
PFX V 0 لێکب .
PFX V 0 پێم  .
PFX V 0 پێت  .
PFX V 0 پێی  .
PFX V 0 پێمان  .
PFX V 0 پێتان  .
PFX V 0 پێیان  .
PFX V 0 پێکم .
PFX V 0 پێکت .
PFX V 0 پێکی .
PFX V 0 پێکمان .
PFX V 0 پێکتان .
PFX V 0 تێیان .
PFX V 0 تێکم .
PFX V 0 تێکت .
PFX V 0 تێکی .
PFX V 0 تێکمان .
PFX V 0 تێکتان .
PFX V 0 تێکیان .
PFX V 0 دام .
PFX V 0 دات .
PFX V 0 دای .
PFX V 0 دامان .
PFX V 0 داتان .
PFX V 0 دایان .
PFX V 0 دەرم .
PFX V 0 دەرت .
PFX V 0 دەری .
PFX V 0 دەرمان .
PFX V 0 دەرتان .
PFX V 0 دەریان .
PFX V 0 ڕام .
PFX V 0 ڕات .
PFX V 0 ڕای .
PFX V 0 ڕامان .
PFX V 0 ڕاتان .
PFX V 0 ڕایان .
PFX V 0 سەرم .
PFX V 0 سەرت .
PFX V 0 سەری .
PFX V 0 سەرمان .
PFX V 0 سەرتان .
PFX V 0 سەریان .
PFX V 0 بەرم .
PFX V 0 بەرت .
PFX V 0 بەری .
PFX V 0 بەرمان .
PFX V 0 بەرتان .
PFX V 0 بەریان .
PFX V 0 لێم .
PFX V 0 لێت .
PFX V 0 لێی .
PFX V 0 لێمان .
PFX V 0 لێتان .
PFX V 0 لێیان .
PFX V 0 هەڵم .
PFX V 0 هەڵت .
PFX V 0 هەڵی .
PFX V 0 هەڵمان .
PFX V 0 هەڵتان .
PFX V 0 هەڵیان .
PFX V 0 وێم .
PFX V 0 وێت .
PFX V 0 وێی .
PFX V 0 وێمان .
PFX V 0 وێتان .
PFX V 0 وێیان .
PFX V 0 وەرم .
PFX V 0 وەرت .
PFX V 0 وەری .
PFX V 0 وەرمان .
PFX V 0 وەرتان .
PFX V 0 وەریان .
PFX V 0 ڕۆم .
PFX V 0 ڕۆت .
PFX V 0 ڕۆی .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمان .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتان .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیان .
PFX V 0 بەرم .
PFX V 0 بەرت .
PFX V 0 بەری .
PFX V 0 بەرمان .
PFX V 0 بەرتان .
PFX V 0 بەریان .
PFX V 0 وێکم .
PFX V 0 وێکت .
PFX V 0 وێکی .
PFX V 0 وێکمان .
PFX V 0 وێکتان .
PFX V 0 وێکیان .
PFX V 0 لێکم .
PFX V 0 لێکت .
PFX V 0 لێکی .
PFX V 0 لێکمان .
PFX V 0 لێکتان .
PFX V 0 لێکیان .
PFX V 0 پێمدە .
PFX V 0 پێمئە .
PFX V 0 پێمنا .
PFX V 0 پێممە .
PFX V 0 پێمنە .
PFX V 0 پێمب .
PFX V 0 پێتدە .
PFX V 0 پێتئە .
PFX V 0 پێتنا .
PFX V 0 پێتمە .
PFX V 0 پێتنە .
PFX V 0 پێتب .
PFX V 0 پێیدە .
PFX V 0 پێیئە .
PFX V 0 پێینا .
PFX V 0 پێیمە .
PFX V 0 پێینە .
PFX V 0 پێیب .
PFX V 0 پێماندە .
PFX V 0 پێمانئە .
PFX V 0 پێماننا .
PFX V 0 پێمانمە .
PFX V 0 پێماننە .
PFX V 0 پێمانب .
PFX V 0 پێتاندە .
PFX V 0 پێتانئە .
PFX V 0 پێتاننا .
PFX V 0 پێتانمە .
PFX V 0 پێتاننە .
PFX V 0 پێتانب .
PFX V 0 پێیاندە .
PFX V 0 پێیانئە .
PFX V 0 پێیاننا .
PFX V 0 پێیانمە .
PFX V 0 پێیاننە .
PFX V 0 پێیانب .
PFX V 0 پێکمدە .
PFX V 0 پێکمئە .
PFX V 0 پێکمنا .
PFX V 0 پێکممە .
PFX V 0 پێکمنە .
PFX V 0 پێکمب .
PFX V 0 پێکتدە .
PFX V 0 پێکتئە .
PFX V 0 پێکتنا .
PFX V 0 پێکتمە .
PFX V 0 پێکتنە .
PFX V 0 پێکتب .
PFX V 0 پێکیدە .
PFX V 0 پێکیئە .
PFX V 0 پێکینا .
PFX V 0 پێکیمە .
PFX V 0 پێکینە .
PFX V 0 پێکیب .
PFX V 0 پێکماندە .
PFX V 0 پێکمانئە .
PFX V 0 پێکماننا .
PFX V 0 پێکمانمە .
PFX V 0 پێکماننە .
PFX V 0 پێکمانب .
PFX V 0 پێکتاندە .
PFX V 0 پێکتانئە .
PFX V 0 پێکتاننا .
PFX V 0 پێکتانمە .
PFX V 0 پێکتاننە .
PFX V 0 پێکتانب .
PFX V 0 پێکیاندە .
PFX V 0 پێکیانئە .
PFX V 0 پێکیاننا .
PFX V 0 پێکیانمە .
PFX V 0 پێکیاننە .
PFX V 0 پێکیانب .
PFX V 0 تێمدە .
PFX V 0 تێمئە .
PFX V 0 تێمنا .
PFX V 0 تێممە .
PFX V 0 تێمنە .
PFX V 0 تێمب .
PFX V 0 تێتدە .
PFX V 0 تێتئە .
PFX V 0 تێتنا .
PFX V 0 تێتمە .
PFX V 0 تێتنە .
PFX V 0 تێتب .
PFX V 0 تێیدە .
PFX V 0 تێیئە .
PFX V 0 تێینا .
PFX V 0 تێیمە .
PFX V 0 تێینە .
PFX V 0 تێیب .
PFX V 0 تێماندە .
PFX V 0 تێمانئە .
PFX V 0 تێماننا .
PFX V 0 تێمانمە .
PFX V 0 تێماننە .
PFX V 0 تێمانب .
PFX V 0 تێتاندە .
PFX V 0 تێتانئە .
PFX V 0 تێتاننا .
PFX V 0 تێتانمە .
PFX V 0 تێتاننە .
PFX V 0 تێتانب .
PFX V 0 تێیاندە .
PFX V 0 تێیانئە .
PFX V 0 تێیاننا .
PFX V 0 تێیانمە .
PFX V 0 تێیاننە .
PFX V 0 تێیانب .
PFX V 0 تێکمدە .
PFX V 0 تێکمئە .
PFX V 0 تێکمنا .
PFX V 0 تێکممە .
PFX V 0 تێکمنە .
PFX V 0 تێکمب .
PFX V 0 تێکتدە .
PFX V 0 تێکتئە .
PFX V 0 تێکتنا .
PFX V 0 تێکتمە .
PFX V 0 تێکتنە .
PFX V 0 تێکتب .
PFX V 0 تێکیدە .
PFX V 0 تێکیئە .
PFX V 0 تێکینا .
PFX V 0 تێکیمە .
PFX V 0 تێکینە .
PFX V 0 تێکیب .
PFX V 0 تێکماندە .
PFX V 0 تێکمانئە .
PFX V 0 تێکماننا .
PFX V 0 تێکمانمە .
PFX V 0 تێکماننە .
PFX V 0 تێکمانب .
PFX V 0 تێکتاندە .
PFX V 0 تێکتانئە .
PFX V 0 تێکتاننا .
PFX V 0 تێکتانمە .
PFX V 0 تێکتاننە .
PFX V 0 تێکتانب .
PFX V 0 تێکیاندە .
PFX V 0 تێکیانئە .
PFX V 0 تێکیاننا .
PFX V 0 تێکیانمە .
PFX V 0 تێکیاننە .
PFX V 0 تێکیانب .
PFX V 0 دامدە .
PFX V 0 دامئە .
PFX V 0 دامنا .
PFX V 0 داممە .
PFX V 0 دامنە .
PFX V 0 دامب .
PFX V 0 داتدە .
PFX V 0 داتئە .
PFX V 0 داتنا .
PFX V 0 داتمە .
PFX V 0 داتنە .
PFX V 0 داتب .
PFX V 0 دایدە .
PFX V 0 دایئە .
PFX V 0 داینا .
PFX V 0 دایمە .
PFX V 0 داینە .
PFX V 0 دایب .
PFX V 0 داماندە .
PFX V 0 دامانئە .
PFX V 0 داماننا .
PFX V 0 دامانمە .
PFX V 0 داماننە .
PFX V 0 دامانب .
PFX V 0 داتاندە .
PFX V 0 داتانئە .
PFX V 0 داتاننا .
PFX V 0 داتانمە .
PFX V 0 داتاننە .
PFX V 0 داتانب .
PFX V 0 دایاندە .
PFX V 0 دایانئە .
PFX V 0 دایاننا .
PFX V 0 دایانمە .
PFX V 0 دایاننە .
PFX V 0 دایانب .
PFX V 0 دەرمدە .
PFX V 0 دەرمئە .
PFX V 0 دەرمنا .
PFX V 0 دەرممە .
PFX V 0 دەرمنە .
PFX V 0 دەرمب .
PFX V 0 دەرتدە .
PFX V 0 دەرتئە .
PFX V 0 دەرتنا .
PFX V 0 دەرتمە .
PFX V 0 دەرتنە .
PFX V 0 دەرتب .
PFX V 0 دەریدە .
PFX V 0 دەریئە .
PFX V 0 دەرینا .
PFX V 0 دەریمە .
PFX V 0 دەرینە .
PFX V 0 دەریب .
PFX V 0 دەرماندە .
PFX V 0 دەرمانئە .
PFX V 0 دەرماننا .
PFX V 0 دەرمانمە .
PFX V 0 دەرماننە .
PFX V 0 دەرمانب .
PFX V 0 دەرتاندە .
PFX V 0 دەرتانئە .
PFX V 0 دەرتاننا .
PFX V 0 دەرتانمە .
PFX V 0 دەرتاننە .
PFX V 0 دەرتانب .
PFX V 0 دەریاندە .
PFX V 0 دەریانئە .
PFX V 0 دەریاننا .
PFX V 0 دەریانمە .
PFX V 0 دەریاننە .
PFX V 0 دەریانب .
PFX V 0 ڕامدە .
PFX V 0 ڕامئە .
PFX V 0 ڕامنا .
PFX V 0 ڕاممە .
PFX V 0 ڕامنە .
PFX V 0 ڕامب .
PFX V 0 ڕاتدە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتئە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتنا .
PFX V 0 ڕاتمە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتنە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتب .
PFX V 0 ڕایدە .
PFX V 0 ڕایئە .
PFX V 0 ڕاینا .
PFX V 0 ڕایمە .
PFX V 0 ڕاینە .
PFX V 0 ڕایب .
PFX V 0 ڕاماندە .
PFX V 0 ڕامانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕاماننا .
PFX V 0 ڕامانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕاماننە .
PFX V 0 ڕامانب .
PFX V 0 ڕاتاندە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتاننا .
PFX V 0 ڕاتانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتاننە .
PFX V 0 ڕاتانب .
PFX V 0 ڕایاندە .
PFX V 0 ڕایانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕایاننا .
PFX V 0 ڕایانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕایاننە .
PFX V 0 ڕایانب .
PFX V 0 سەرمدە .
PFX V 0 سەرمئە .
PFX V 0 سەرمنا .
PFX V 0 سەرممە .
PFX V 0 سەرمنە .
PFX V 0 سەرمب .
PFX V 0 سەرتدە .
PFX V 0 سەرتئە .
PFX V 0 سەرتنا .
PFX V 0 سەرتمە .
PFX V 0 سەرتنە .
PFX V 0 سەرتب .
PFX V 0 سەریدە .
PFX V 0 سەریئە .
PFX V 0 سەرینا .
PFX V 0 سەریمە .
PFX V 0 سەرینە .
PFX V 0 سەریب .
PFX V 0 سەرماندە .
PFX V 0 سەرمانئە .
PFX V 0 سەرماننا .
PFX V 0 سەرمانمە .
PFX V 0 سەرماننە .
PFX V 0 سەرمانب .
PFX V 0 سەرتاندە .
PFX V 0 سەرتانئە .
PFX V 0 سەرتاننا .
PFX V 0 سەرتانمە .
PFX V 0 سەرتاننە .
PFX V 0 سەرتانب .
PFX V 0 سەریاندە .
PFX V 0 سەریانئە .
PFX V 0 سەریاننا .
PFX V 0 سەریانمە .
PFX V 0 سەریاننە .
PFX V 0 سەریانب .
PFX V 0 بەرمدە .
PFX V 0 بەرمئە .
PFX V 0 بەرمنا .
PFX V 0 بەرممە .
PFX V 0 بەرمنە .
PFX V 0 بەرمب .
PFX V 0 بەرتدە .
PFX V 0 بەرتئە .
PFX V 0 بەرتنا .
PFX V 0 بەرتمە .
PFX V 0 بەرتنە .
PFX V 0 بەرتب .
PFX V 0 بەریدە .
PFX V 0 بەریئە .
PFX V 0 بەرینا .
PFX V 0 بەریمە .
PFX V 0 بەرینە .
PFX V 0 بەریب .
PFX V 0 بەرماندە .
PFX V 0 بەرمانئە .
PFX V 0 بەرماننا .
PFX V 0 بەرمانمە .
PFX V 0 بەرماننە .
PFX V 0 بەرمانب .
PFX V 0 بەرتاندە .
PFX V 0 بەرتانئە .
PFX V 0 بەرتاننا .
PFX V 0 بەرتانمە .
PFX V 0 بەرتاننە .
PFX V 0 بەرتانب .
PFX V 0 بەریاندە .
PFX V 0 بەریانئە .
PFX V 0 بەریاننا .
PFX V 0 بەریانمە .
PFX V 0 بەریاننە .
PFX V 0 بەریانب .
PFX V 0 لێمدە .
PFX V 0 لێمئە .
PFX V 0 لێمنا .
PFX V 0 لێممە .
PFX V 0 لێمنە .
PFX V 0 لێمب .
PFX V 0 لێتدە .
PFX V 0 لێتئە .
PFX V 0 لێتنا .
PFX V 0 لێتمە .
PFX V 0 لێتنە .
PFX V 0 لێتب .
PFX V 0 لێیدە .
PFX V 0 لێیئە .
PFX V 0 لێینا .
PFX V 0 لێیمە .
PFX V 0 لێینە .
PFX V 0 لێیب .
PFX V 0 لێماندە .
PFX V 0 لێمانئە .
PFX V 0 لێماننا .
PFX V 0 لێمانمە .
PFX V 0 لێماننە .
PFX V 0 لێمانب .
PFX V 0 لێتاندە .
PFX V 0 لێتانئە .
PFX V 0 لێتاننا .
PFX V 0 لێتانمە .
PFX V 0 لێتاننە .
PFX V 0 لێتانب .
PFX V 0 لێیاندە .
PFX V 0 لێیانئە .
PFX V 0 لێیاننا .
PFX V 0 لێیانمە .
PFX V 0 لێیاننە .
PFX V 0 لێیانب .
PFX V 0 هەڵمدە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمنا .
PFX V 0 هەڵممە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمنە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمب .
PFX V 0 هەڵتدە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتنا .
PFX V 0 هەڵتمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتنە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتب .
PFX V 0 هەڵیدە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵینا .
PFX V 0 هەڵیمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵینە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیب .
PFX V 0 هەڵماندە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمانئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵماننا .
PFX V 0 هەڵمانمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵماننە .
PFX V 0 هەڵمانب .
PFX V 0 هەڵتاندە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتانئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتاننا .
PFX V 0 هەڵتانمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتاننە .
PFX V 0 هەڵتانب .
PFX V 0 هەڵیاندە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیانئە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیاننا .
PFX V 0 هەڵیانمە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیاننە .
PFX V 0 هەڵیانب .
PFX V 0 وێمدە .
PFX V 0 وێمئە .
PFX V 0 وێمنا .
PFX V 0 وێممە .
PFX V 0 وێمنە .
PFX V 0 وێمب .
PFX V 0 وێتدە .
PFX V 0 وێتئە .
PFX V 0 وێتنا .
PFX V 0 وێتمە .
PFX V 0 وێتنە .
PFX V 0 وێتب .
PFX V 0 وێیدە .
PFX V 0 وێیئە .
PFX V 0 وێینا .
PFX V 0 وێیمە .
PFX V 0 وێینە .
PFX V 0 وێیب .
PFX V 0 وێماندە .
PFX V 0 وێمانئە .
PFX V 0 وێماننا .
PFX V 0 وێمانمە .
PFX V 0 وێماننە .
PFX V 0 وێمانب .
PFX V 0 وێتاندە .
PFX V 0 وێتانئە .
PFX V 0 وێتاننا .
PFX V 0 وێتانمە .
PFX V 0 وێتاننە .
PFX V 0 وێتانب .
PFX V 0 وێیاندە .
PFX V 0 وێیانئە .
PFX V 0 وێیاننا .
PFX V 0 وێیانمە .
PFX V 0 وێیاننە .
PFX V 0 وێیانب .
PFX V 0 وەرمدە .
PFX V 0 وەرمئە .
PFX V 0 وەرمنا .
PFX V 0 وەرممە .
PFX V 0 وەرمنە .
PFX V 0 وەرمب .
PFX V 0 وەرتدە .
PFX V 0 وەرتئە .
PFX V 0 وەرتنا .
PFX V 0 وەرتمە .
PFX V 0 وەرتنە .
PFX V 0 وەرتب .
PFX V 0 وەریدە .
PFX V 0 وەریئە .
PFX V 0 وەرینا .
PFX V 0 وەریمە .
PFX V 0 وەرینە .
PFX V 0 وەریب .
PFX V 0 وەرماندە .
PFX V 0 وەرمانئە .
PFX V 0 وەرماننا .
PFX V 0 وەرمانمە .
PFX V 0 وەرماننە .
PFX V 0 وەرمانب .
PFX V 0 وەرتاندە .
PFX V 0 وەرتانئە .
PFX V 0 وەرتاننا .
PFX V 0 وەرتانمە .
